test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kall_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kåʹll â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     kåʹll+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: kåʹll
     kåʹll+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: kååʹll
     kåʹll+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: kååʹll
     kåʹll+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: kålla
     kåʹll+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: kååʹllest
     kåʹll+N+Sg+Com+Indef: kooʹllin
     kåʹll+N+Ess+Indef: kåʹllen
     kåʹll+N+Par+Indef: kåʹlled
     kåʹll+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [kååʹlltaa, kååʹlltää]
     kåʹll+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: kååʹll
     kåʹll+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: kooʹlli
     kåʹll+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: kooʹllid
     kåʹll+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: kooʹllid
     kåʹll+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: kooʹllin
     kåʹll+N+Pl+Com+Indef: kooʹllivuiʹm
     kåʹll+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [kooʹllitaa, kooʹllitää]
